Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.200

References to regular session of the legislature.

After June 12, 1980, all references in the Revised Code of Washington to a regular session of the legislature mean a regular session during an odd- or even-numbered year unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

[ 1980 c 87 s 1.]